Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1234
Emergency care provider; liability within scope of practice.

No act of commission or omission of any emergency care provider while rendering emergency medical care within the limits of his or her licensure or status as a trainee to a person who is deemed by the provider to be in immediate danger of injury or loss of life shall impose any liability on any other person, and this section shall not relieve the emergency care provider from personal liability, if any.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 25;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5196;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 518;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 39.